Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201579-2,148
Return-to-learn protocol; establishment.

Each approved or accredited public, private, denominational, or parochial school shall establish a return-to-learn protocol for students returning to school after being treated for pediatric cancer. The return-to-learn protocol shall recognize that students who have been treated for pediatric cancer and returned to school may need informal or formal accommodations, modifications of curriculum, and monitoring by medical or academic staff.

Laws 2015, LB511, § 2.